North Dakota, session 69, HB1442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-35 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Legislative task force on government efficiency - Members - Duties - Report to the legislative
management.
1. The legislative management shall create a legislative task force on government efficiency.
2. Each member of the task force shall serve two - year terms. The membership of the task force
consists of:
a. The director of the office of management and budget;
b. The chief operating officer for the office of the governor;
c. One elected statewide officer, appointed by the governor;
d. One individual residing in the state, appointed by the governor;
e. Three members of the house of representatives, appointed by the majority leader of the
house of representatives; and
f. Three members of the senate, appointed by the majority leader of the senate.
3. The chairman of the legislative management shall select a member of the legislative assembly
appointed under subdivision e or f of subsection 2 to serve as chairman of the task force .
4. The task force shall:
a. Meet at least once each calendar quarter or more frequently at the call of the chairman.
b. Review and analyze budgets and reports from executive branch agencies and the
supreme court.
c. Collaborate with and receive testimony from executive branch agencies and the supreme
court to identify areas to increase efficiency and methods to implement cos t - saving
measures, determine areas of state government deemed unnecessary or duplicative,
target outdated or overly restrictive regulations, and find areas in which partnerships
between the state and private industry would create innovative financing models to drive
economic growth and job creation.
d. Review the effectiveness and necessity of programs and laws created by the legislative
assembly through previous legislative enactments.

H. B. NO. 1442 - PAGE 2
e. Request the state auditor or an independent private auditing firm to conduct program
evaluations using generally accepted performance audit standards for state and local
governments.
f. Submit an annual report to the legislative management detailing its findings and progress
in implementing cos t - saving measures and efficiencies along with any recommended
legislation for introduction at the next legislative session.
5. A state employee who is a member of the task force is entitled to receive that employee's
regular salary and is entitled to reimbursement for mileage and expenses to be paid by the
employing agency. A member of the task force who is a member of the legislative assembly is
entitled to receive per diem compensation at the rate provided under section 54 - 35 - 10 for
each day performing official duties of the task force. The legislative council shall pay the per
diem compensation and reimbursement for travel and expenses as provided by law for any
member of the task force who is a member of the legislative assembly.
6. The legislative council shall provide staffing and administrative services for the task force
through July 31, 2031 .
SECTION 2. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through July 31, 2031, and after that date is
ineffective.
SECTION 3. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

H. B. NO. 1442 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1442 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 4 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State